Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Dive Fishery Management Assessment.

Sec. 43.76.150.
Dive fishery management assessment.

A dive fishery management assessment on fishery resources taken by dive gear shall be levied on the value of the fishery resource taken in a dive gear fishery. The species of fishery resources subject to the assessment and the rate of the assessment, as determined under (b) — (h) of this section, shall be determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of one percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of two percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of three percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of four percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of five percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of six percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A person holding a limited entry permit for dive gear or an interim-use permit for dive gear issued under AS 16.43 shall pay a dive fishery management assessment of seven percent on a species of fishery resources that is subject to the assessment as determined by an election under AS

43.76.160

, that is taken by dive gear, and that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A dive fishery management assessment may only be levied or collected on a fishery resource in an administrative area if

there exists in that administrative area an association determined by the commissioner of fish and game to be a qualified regional dive fishery development association under AS

16.40.240

; and

the species of fishery resource subject to the dive fishery management assessment and the rate of the dive fishery management assessment, as provided under (b) — (h) of this section, is approved by an election under AS

43.76.160

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “a” was inserted before “dive gear fishery” in the first sentence of subsection (a) to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 43.76.160.
Election to approve, amend, or terminate dive fishery management assessment.

A qualified regional dive fishery development association may conduct an election under this section after the commissioner of fish and game approves

the notice to be published by the qualified regional dive fishery development association; the notice must describe the species of fishery resources subject to the dive fishery management assessment and the rate of the dive fishery management assessment to be approved, amended, or terminated at the election;

the ballot to be used in the election; and

the registration and voting procedure for the approval, amendment, or termination of the dive fishery management assessment.

The dive fishery management assessment is levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h), amended under AS

43.76.170

, or terminated under AS

43.76.180

in an administrative area on the effective date stated on the ballot if

the levy, amendment, or termination is approved by a majority of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders voting in the election;

at least 25 percent of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders vote in the election; and

the election results are certified by the commissioner of fish and game.

In conducting an election under this section, a qualified regional dive fishery development association shall adopt the following procedures:

the qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area shall hold at least one public meeting not less than 30 days before the date on which ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election to explain, as appropriate, the reason for approval or amendment of the proposed dive fishery management assessment, the reason for the proposed rate of the dive fishery management assessment, or the reason for termination of the dive fishery management assessment and to explain the registration and voting procedure to be used in the election; the qualified regional dive fishery development association shall provide notice of the meeting by

mailing the notice to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder;

posting the notice in at least three public places in the administrative area; and

publishing the notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the administrative area at least once a week for two consecutive weeks before the meeting;

the qualified regional dive fishery development association shall mail two ballots to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder; the first ballot shall be mailed not more than 45 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the second ballot shall be mailed not less than 15 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the qualified regional dive fishery development association shall adopt procedures to ensure that only one ballot from each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder is counted in the election;

the ballot must

indicate the species of fishery resources subject to the dive fishery management assessment;

indicate whether the election relates to a dive fishery management assessment under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h);

ask the question whether the dive fishery management assessment on the fishery resources addressed on the ballot shall be approved, amended, or terminated, as appropriate;

indicate the boundaries of the administrative area in which the dive fishery management assessment will be levied or terminated;

provide an effective date for the approval, amendment, or termination of the dive fishery management assessment; and

indicate the date on which returned ballots must be postmarked in order to be counted;

the ballots shall be returned by mail and shall be counted by an auditor selected by the qualified regional dive fishery development association and approved by the commissioner of fish and game; the qualified regional dive fishery development association shall pay the costs of counting the ballots.

The commissioner of fish and game shall certify the results of an election under this section if the commissioner determines that the requirements of (a) and (c) of this section have been satisfied.

A qualified regional dive fishery development association may employ or contract with another person to administer an election under this section subject to the supervision of the association.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

43.76.170

and

43.76.180

, an election to amend the rate of a dive fishery management assessment or to terminate a dive fishery management assessment shall be conducted under the same procedures established under (a) — (d) of this section for an election to approve a dive fishery management assessment.

In this section, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder” means an individual who, 90 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in an election under this section, is listed in the records of the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission as the legal holder of an interim-use permit for dive gear or an entry permit for dive gear that authorizes the individual to fish commercially in the administrative area for the species of fishery resource for which the dive fishery management assessment is to be approved, amended, or terminated.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am §§ 2, 3 ch 156 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 95 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 25, 2018, in (b), in the introductory language, inserted “, amended under AS

43.76.170

, or terminated under AS

43.76.180

” preceding “in an administrative area”, rewrote (a)(1), added (a)(2), and made related changes; in (f), substituted “under (a) – (d)” for “under (a), (c), and (d)” following “established under”.

Sec. 43.76.170.
Amendment of dive fishery management assessment.

The rate of the dive fishery management assessment levied on a species of fishery resources under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) may be amended by the commissioner of revenue upon majority vote at an election held under AS

43.76.160

in the administrative area in which the dive fishery management assessment is levied.

The commissioner of revenue shall amend the rate of a dive fishery management assessment under (a) of this section following an election in an administrative area if

a petition that is signed by at least 75 percent of the board members of the qualified regional dive fishery development association established for the administrative area under AS

16.40.240

is presented to the commissioner of fish and game requesting amendment of the rate of the dive fishery management assessment on a species of fishery resources; the petition must state whether the proposed rate of the dive fishery management assessment is to be levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h);

an election is held in accordance with AS

43.76.160

; the ballot must ask the question whether the dive fishery management assessment on a species of fishery resources taken in the administrative area shall be amended and must state whether the dive fishery management assessment on the species of fishery resources is to be levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) if the assessment is amended; the ballot must be worded so that a “yes” vote is for amendment of the dive fishery management assessment and a “no” vote is for continuation of the current dive fishery management assessment;

a majority of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders who vote in the election cast a ballot for the amendment of the dive fishery management assessment; in this paragraph, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.160

; and

the qualified regional dive fishery development association provides notice of the election in accordance with AS 43.76.160 within two months after receiving notice from the commissioner of fish and game that the petition submitted by the qualified regional dive fishery development association under (1) of this subsection has been received and is valid.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 156 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 25, 2018, in (b)(1), substituted “at least 75 percent of the board members of the qualified regional dive fishery development association established for the administrative area under AS

16.40.240

” for “at least 25 percent of the number of persons who voted under AS

43.76.160

in the most recent election approving or amending the dive fishery management assessment on the species of fishery resources in the administrative area that are the subject of the petition” following “that is signed by”, deleted “only a person who would be eligible to vote in an election to amend the rate of the assessment may validly sign the petition;” at the end, and made a stylistic change, in (b)(4), substituted “the petition submitted by the qualified regional dive fishery development association under one of this subsection has been received and is valid” for “a valid petition under (1) of this subsection has been received” following “fish and game that”.

Sec. 43.76.180.
Termination of dive fishery management assessment.

The dive fishery management assessment levied on a species of fishery resources under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) shall be terminated by the commissioner of revenue upon majority vote at an election held under AS

43.76.160

in the administrative area in which the dive fishery management assessment is levied.

The commissioner of revenue shall terminate a dive fishery management assessment under (a) of this section following an election in an administrative area if

a petition that is signed by at least 75 percent of the board members of the qualified regional dive fishery development association established for the administrative area under AS

16.40.240

is presented to the commissioner of fish and game requesting termination of the dive fishery management assessment on a species of fishery resources;

an election is held in accordance with AS

43.76.160

; the ballot must ask the question whether the dive fishery management assessment on a species of fishery resources taken in the administrative area shall be terminated; the ballot must be worded so that a “yes” vote is for continuation of the dive fishery management assessment and a “no” vote is for termination of the dive fishery management assessment;

a majority of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders who vote in the election cast a ballot for the termination of the dive fishery management assessment; in this paragraph, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.160

; and

the qualified regional dive fishery development association provides notice of the election in accordance with AS 43.76.160 within two months after receiving notice from the commissioner of fish and game that the petition submitted by the qualified regional dive fishery development association under (1) of this subsection has been received and is valid.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 156 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 25, 2018, in (b)(1), substituted “at least 75 percent of the board members of the qualified regional dive fishery development association established for the administrative area under AS

16.40.240

” for “at least 25 percent of the number of persons who voted under AS

43.76.160

in the most recent election approving or amending the dive fishery management assessment on the species of fishery resources in the administrative area that are the subject of the petition” following “that is signed by”, deleted “only a person who would be eligible to vote in an election to repeal the assessment may validly sign the petition;” at the end, and made a stylistic change, in (b)(4), substituted “the petition submitted by the qualified regional dive fishery development association under one of this subsection has been received and is valid” for “a valid petition under (1) of this subsection has been received” following “fish and game that”.

Sec. 43.76.190.
Collection of assessment.

Except as otherwise provided under (e) of this section, a buyer who acquires a fishery resource that is subject to a dive fishery management assessment levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) shall collect the dive fishery management assessment at the time of purchase and shall remit the total dive fishery management assessment collected during each calendar quarter to the Department of Revenue by the last day of the month following the end of the calendar quarter. In this subsection, “calendar quarter” means each of the three-month periods ending March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31.

A buyer who collects the dive fishery management assessment shall maintain records of the value of each species of fishery resources that is subject to an assessment that is purchased in each administrative area of the state.

The owner of fishery resources removed from the state is liable for payment of the dive fishery management assessment levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) if, at the time the fishery resource is removed from the state, the assessment payable on the fishery resource has not been collected by a buyer. If the owner of the fishery resource is liable for payment of the dive fishery management assessment under this subsection, the owner shall comply with the requirements under (a) and (b) of this section to remit the assessment to the Department of Revenue and to maintain records.

The dive fishery management assessment collected under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury. Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, assessment receipts shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund.

A direct marketing fisheries business licensed under AS

43.75.020(c)

or a commercial fisherman who transfers possession of a fishery resource to a buyer who is not a fisheries business licensed under AS 43.75 is liable for payment of a dive fishery management assessment levied under AS

43.76.150(b)

, (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) if, at the time possession of the fishery resource is transferred to a buyer, the dive fishery management assessment payable on the fishery resource has not been collected. If a direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman is liable for payment of a dive fishery management assessment under this subsection, the direct marketing fisheries business or commercial fisherman shall comply with the requirement to maintain records under (b) of this section. Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person subject to this subsection shall remit the total dive fishery management assessment payable during the calendar year to the Department of Revenue before April 1 after close of the calendar year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 2000; am §§ 10, 11 ch 147 SLA 2004; am §§ 6, 7 ch 156 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (d), “AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146(b)

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

37.05.146

.

In 2004, in the first sentence of subsection (e), a reference to AS

43.76.150(f)

, (g), and (h) was added to reconcile chs. 147 and 156, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.200.
Funding for qualified regional dive fishery development associations.

The legislature may make appropriations of revenue collected under AS

43.76.190

to the Department of Fish and Game for funding of the qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area in which the assessment was collected. Appropriations under this section are not made from the unrestricted general fund. Funds received under this section by a qualified regional dive fishery development association may be expended in accordance with the annual operating plan developed under (b) of this section.

The Department of Fish and Game shall develop an annual operating plan with the cooperation of the regional dive fishery development association and the Department of Environmental Conservation on or before a date specified by the Department of Fish and Game. The qualified regional dive fishery development association and the Department of Environmental Conservation shall cooperate with the Department of Fish and Game in the development of the annual operating plan. The annual operating plan must describe the activities for which the funding will be expended, including identification of species and areas for which bioassessment surveys will be conducted, a description of management and research activities to be performed, planning for dive fisheries, and administrative activities of the association. Funds appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for funding of qualified regional dive fishery development associations may not be disbursed by the department or expended by the association, except for administration of the association, unless the annual operating plan has been approved by the association and the Department of Fish and Game. If an annual operating plan has not been approved by the association and the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Fish and Game may not disburse and the association may not expend funds received from the department for administration of the association in an amount that exceeds the amount of administrative expenses authorized under the annual operating plan for the prior fiscal year.

A qualified regional dive fishery development association receiving funding under this section shall submit an annual financial report to the Department of Fish and Game on a form provided by the Department of Fish and Game. The Department of Fish and Game may, by regulation, require that a qualified regional dive fishery development association use a uniform system of accounting and may audit the use of funding received under this section by the association.

This section does not establish a dedication of a state tax or license.

This section does not restrict or qualify the authority of the Department of Fish and Game or the Board of Fisheries under AS 16.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 101 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 123 SLA 2002)

Sec. 43.76.210.
Definitions.

In AS

43.76.150

—

43.76.210

,

“administrative area” means an area established by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission under AS

16.43.200

for regulating and controlling entry into fisheries using dive gear;

“buyer” means a person who acquires possession of a fishery resource from the person who caught the fishery resource, regardless of whether there is an actual sale of the fishery resource, but does not include a person engaged solely in interstate transportation of goods for hire;

“fishery resource” means fish, shellfish, or marine invertebrates taken or landed under the authority of a limited entry permit or interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43 for dive gear;

“qualified regional dive fishery development association” means an association that is qualified under AS

16.40.240

;

“value” has the meaning given in AS

43.75.290

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 90 SLA 1997)